Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 1
CIVIL AIR PATROL

Section

28-1-101. Colorado division of civil air patrol - publication - benefits.

There is created and established in the department of military and veterans affairs the Colorado division of civil air patrol. The division is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. The mission of the division is to provide support for and facilitate the operation of the civil air patrol, Colorado wing, which is under the command and control of the duly appointed commanding officer of the wing. On and after July 1, 2004, the head of the division is appointed by the adjutant general acting on behalf of the governor and in consultation with the duly appointed commanding officer of the civil air patrol, Colorado wing. Warrants are drawn against appropriations made for the division upon vouchers issued and signed by the head of the division.

All active officers in the civil air patrol, Colorado wing, including the duly appointed commanding officer of the civil air patrol, Colorado wing, shall be eligible to be appointed as the head of the Colorado division of civil air patrol by the adjutant general.

Repealed.

Publications of the division circulated in quantity outside the executive branch, to be paid for in whole or in part out of state-appropriated funds, shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Members of the civil air patrol, Colorado wing, shall be eligible for benefits under the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado". Premiums for such coverage shall be included in annual appropriations by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 253, §§ 1-3.

CSA:

C. 17, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 5-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-2-1.

L. 64:

p. 122, § 20.

L. 68:

p. 136, § 169.

L. 78:

(4) added, p. 279, § 5, effective May 5.

L. 83:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 840, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4) amended, p. 571, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, p. 1272, § 205, effective August 7.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 360, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1882, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3416, § 185, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

(2) For the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", see articles 40 to 47 of title 8.

(3) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

28-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Civil air patrol mission" means an actual emergency operational mission of the Colorado wing of civil air patrol that has been duly authorized under civil air patrol regulations, including, but not limited to, through the United States Air Force, the governor's office, or other political subdivision of the state that has the authority to authorize an emergency operational mission of the Colorado wing of the civil air patrol.

"Member" means a member of the civil air patrol, Colorado wing.

"Private employer" means an employer that is not the state or any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or other public agency of the state.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 608, § 1, effective August 5.

28-1-103. Civil air patrol - discrimination prohibited.

An employer shall not discriminate against or discharge from employment any member of the civil air patrol because of such membership and shall not hinder or prevent a member from performing during any civil air patrol mission for which a member is entitled to leave pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 608, § 1, effective August 5.

28-1-104. Public employees - leave of absence.

Any member who is an officer or employee of the state or of any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or other public agency of the state and who is called to duty for a civil air patrol mission is entitled to a leave of absence from the member's office or employment for the time when the member is engaged in the civil air patrol mission without loss of pay, seniority, status, efficiency rating, vacation, sick leave, or other benefits. The leave without loss of pay that is allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed a total of fifteen workdays in the leave year established by the employer; except that such leave without loss of pay shall be allowed only if the required civil air patrol service is satisfactorily performed, which shall be presumed unless the contrary is established.

The leave allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be allowed only if the member returns to his or her public position the next scheduled workday after being relieved from service for the civil air patrol mission; except that leave shall be allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the member is unable to return to work due to injury or circumstances beyond the member's control and the member notifies the employer as soon as practicable, but prior to the next scheduled workday.

A state agency or any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or other public agency of the state may hire a temporary employee to fill a vacancy created by a leave of absence allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Upon returning from a leave of absence allowed pursuant to this section, a member is entitled to return to the same position and classification held by the member before the leave of absence for the civil air patrol mission or to the position, including the geographic location of the position, and classification that the member would have been entitled to if the member did not take a leave of absence for the civil air patrol mission.

A member who is an officer or employee of the state or of any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or other public agency of the state, receiving a leave of absence pursuant to this section and having rights in any state, municipal, or other public pension, retirement, or relief system shall retain all of the rights accrued up to the time of taking the leave and shall have all rights subsequently accruing under such system as if the member did not take the leave. Any increase in the amount of money benefits accruing with respect to the time of the leave is dependent upon the payment of any contributions or assessments, and the right to the increase is dependent upon the payment of contributions or assessments within a reasonable time after the termination of the leave and upon such terms as the authorities in charge of the system may prescribe.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 609, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 09-1315), ch. 312, p. 1694, § 3, effective August 5.

28-1-105. Private employees - leave of absence.

Any member who is employed by a private employer and who is called to duty for a civil air patrol mission is entitled to a leave of absence from the member's private employment, other than employment of a temporary nature, for the time when the member is engaged in the civil air patrol mission. The leave allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed a total of fifteen workdays in any calendar year, and the leave shall be allowed only if the member gives evidence to the employer of the satisfactory completion of the civil air patrol service.

The period of absence allowed pursuant to this section shall be construed as an absence with leave and without pay and shall in no way affect the member's rights to vacation, sick leave, bonus, advancement, or other employment benefits or advantages relating to and normally to be expected for the member's particular employment.

The leave allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be allowed only if the member returns to his or her private employment as soon as practicable after being relieved from service for the civil air patrol mission.

The private employer of a member who takes leave from the member's employment in order to engage in a civil air patrol mission shall, upon the member's completion of the mission, restore the member to the position the member held prior to the leave of absence or to a similar position.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 609, § 1, effective August 5; (3) amended, p. 1912, § 120, effective August 5.

28-1-106. Employer's noncompliance - actions.

If an employer violates any provision of this article, the aggrieved member may bring a civil action for damages or equitable relief or both. In any such civil action, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 610, § 1, effective August 5.